src/dictionaries/lv_LV.dic
Alvita/Rlrx
Asja/Rlrx
Dagnis/Pjuw
Dana/Rlrx
Edžus/Qk
Elga/Rlrx
Ernestīne/Smsf
Ginta/Rlrx
Imalda/Rlrx
Ingus/Qk
Ivis/Pjuw
Jēzus/Q
Kintija/Rlrx
Kleopatra/Rlrx
Krēta/R
Lore/Smsf
Malvīne/Smsf
Marina/Rlrx
Markus/Qk
Marlēne/Smsf
Mikus/Qk
Mozus/Q
Nameizis/Pjuw
Rigonda/Rlrx
Salaspils/T
Saldus/Q
Tonija/Rlrx
Ulvis/Pjuw
Vivita/Rlrx
Zane/Smsf
Zemgus/Qk
Zenta/Rlrx
Zina/Rlrx
afrikāniete/Sm
aizauss/nT
aizlekušus/k
aizrāvuša/R+l
aizspļāvuši/q+
akselbante/Smsf
aktrise/mfSs
alksnis/uwPj
alus/Qk
anarhistisks/oaYi
anestezioloģija/R
anormāls/oaYi
apaugļots/+Yoai
apcērtama/R+l
apdzērušus/k
apkakle/Smfs
apost/+NE2q
apstrīdētāks/oiO+
apstādījumus/k
apvalstītāka/lR+
apvidus/Qk
arabopiranoze/Sm
arheoloģe/Sm
arodapvienība/Rl
asins/nT
atbilduši/q+
atcērtams/+aioO
atlijušus/k
atriebīgs/oaYi
atsaistītāks/oi+
atsutuši/q+
attālinātība/Rl
atvītušais/+y
audze/fmsS
augstmane/Sm
aunāda/rRlx
ausaine/smSf
auss/Tn
autokapsēta/Rlrx
baiļpilns/oaYi
bandrole/Smsf
bezausene/Smfs
bezgalīgs/iYao
blakts/nT
blīvs/+Yaio
bojāgājušus/k
bote/fSs
brēkulis/Pjuw
brīnumzāle/Smsf
burbuļains/oaYi
bute/Smsf
bākuguns/Tn
bārksts/Tn
cerama/+Rl
ceļotājspāre/Sm
cietsirdīgs/oaYi
cietēja/Rlxr
cikāde/Smsf
cilts/Tn
cirtnis/uwjP
ciska/Rlr
daiļamatniece/Sm
dalībvalsts/Tn
debess/nPT
diftongisks/oaYi
disertācija/Rl
divgadīgs/oaYi
divi/q
divpunkte/Sm
divvietīgs/oaYi
dobe/fmSs
donorvalsts/Tn
drosminiece/Sm
dzelzs/nT
dzimumdziņa/R
dzirksts/Tn
dūrušus/k
elastīgs/a+oYi
energokaskāde/Sm
esams/+aoiO
etiķete/Ssfm
ezerpils/Tn
frivols/oaYi
fuksis/Pjuw
fāze/fmSs
gadatirgus/Qk
galvvidus/Qk
garāža/xRrl
garša/Rrl
grambains/oaYi
groteska/Rl
grunts/nT
gruvešains/oaYi
gudrīte/Sm
gulbeniete/Sm
guns/nT
guļamāka/Rl+
iegarens/oaYi
ieklimtušus/k
ielijuši/+q
ieskābs/oa
iesmokoša/R+l
ievaddatus/k
ievelkama/+Rl
igaunisks/oaYi
intensīvs/oaYi
irbeniece/Sm
izcirtuši/q+
izdevējvalsts/T
izlijušus/k
izlikt/a4BI+J[Md
izmācāma/Rl+
izpildredaktore/Sm
izskapstošs/oi+
izskujama/+Rl
izslējuši/+q
izžāvušus/k
jaunkundze/Smsf
jēldzelzs/Tn
kafijkanna/rRlx
kaija/rRlx
karafe/sSmf
karalisks/oaYi
karaļvalsts/Tn
kartupelis/Pujw
kauslapiņa/Rl
kinonozare/S
klepus/Q
klimtušais/y+
klātesošs/oi
kode/Smsf
koksne/Sm
koloniālvalsts/nT
kompakts/oaYi
kontaktdakša/Rlrx
kostarikāniete/Sm
krauklis/Puwj
krustuguns/T
kuce/fmSs
kulinārs/oaYi
kultūridentitāte/Sm
kļava/RlxR
lakonisks/oaYi
lampa/rlRx
lapa/Rlxr
laputs/Tn
ledus/Qk
letarģisks/oaYi
liepājniece/Smsf
lietus/Qk
likme/Smsf
liķieris/wuPj
lunkans/oaYi
lēmuši/+q
līdere/Smsf
maijpuķīte/Sm
maldus/k
martenkrāsns/nT
mazisks/oaYi
mazmazmeita/Rxrl
medalus/Qk
medus/Q
metālapstāde/Sm
mice/Smsf
miesa/Rrxl
migt/I+JaMB4
mineraloģisks/oaYi
mufeļkrāsns/nT
muzikante/Sm
mākonis/uwPj
māsīca/rRxl
mēnesnīca/rRxl
mērens/Yiao
mērglāze/Smsf
nebēdne/Smsf
nepārsteidzība/R
niecīgs/oaYi
niedre/Smsf
noglauzšana/+lR
noklimtušus/k
nokāršošs/o+i
nolēmuši/q+
nospiežoša/+lR
novītušus/k
nāve/Smsf
nēģeriete/Sm
ofensīvs/oaYi
okupētājvalsts/T
optimistisks/oaYi
ostmala/Rl
ozolaine/Sm
pacietuši/q+
padrūms/oaYi
palīdušus/k
pamatmaksa/R
panīkt/+7BdIa^ZJ4M[
paradīze/Ss
parciāls/oaYi
pasmējuši/+q
pastelis/ujPw
pastēte/Smsf
pasāža/Rl
patērētājvalsts/Tn
paviršs/oaYi
peldinātava/Rl
pelēkbalts/o
peroksidāze/Sm
piebalss/Tn
piebļāvušus/k
piebūrušais/y+
piedzēruši/+q
piepūle/S
pierijušus/k
piesaule/sSfm
pieskāvuši/q+
pieslēdzēja/Rl
piesākt/Ia(hB+J8M4
piezveļams/+oi
pinne/fmSs
pirmdiena/Rl
porains/+Yaoi
priekšass/Tn
prizma/lxrR
profildzelzs/Tn
pumpa/Rxlr
pupuķis/wujP
purene/sfSm
pārcirtušus/k
pārcērpams/+oOi
pārklimtuši/+q
pārknūpama/+lR
pārmācība/R
pārplūde/Sm
pārsteigts/oaYi
pārstūmušus/k
pārvaldniece/Sm
pāršķīduši/+q
pīle/mfSs
rahītisks/oaYi
rakstāmpults/Tn
robežattiecība/Rl
rodamāka/R+l
rugaine/Smsf
rācenis/Pjuw
sagrāvušus/k
saite/fsmS
sakrimtušais/+y
salecams/oiO+
sametuši/q+
saskarne/Sm
saspļāvušus/k
sastūma/+l
satraukt/+adB%I6JM[5
savdabīgs/oaYi
senvalsts/T
septiņi/q
sfēra/rxRl
siena/rRlx
signālspuldze/Sm
signāluguns/Tn
siltalus/Qk
skice/msSf
sloksne/Smfs
slēdzis/uPwj
spiedīgs/oaYi
sprostuguns/T
spēle/smfS
spīdīgs/Yi+oa
standartceltniecība/Rl
starpzole/Sm
statnis/uPjw
straume/Smsf
strīpains/oaYi
stūmuša/+Rl
sālnīca/rlxR
sētmale/Sm
sētsvidus/Qk
sīkdaļa/Rrxl
sīkumains/ao+Yi
sīkumtirgus/Qk
taburete/sSmf
taksis/jPwu
telts/Tn
terīne/fsSm
tirgus/Qk
tranzītvalsts/Tn
trīssimttūkstoš/q
tvīksme/S
tēvišķs/oaYi
tīģelis/Pjuw
upe/fsSm
uzjāvušus/k
uzkļūt/+IB7a^J4ZM
uzposa/l+
uzrotājuši/q+
uzsienams/+ioO
vakts/nT
valsts/Tn
vara/Rl
velkme/Smsf
venecuēliete/Sm
vidus/Qk
viesuļuguns/T
vilna/RlRx
virsāda/xlrR
virtuozs/oaYi
visahromatiskākais/y
visaugstprātīgākais/y
visbēdīgākais/y
visdivkrāsainākais/y
visfamiliārākais/y
visgāzveidīgākais/y
visizskatīgākais/y
viskonverģentākais/y
vislielmolekulārākais/y
vismiegainākais/y
visneilggadējākais/y
visneraupjākais/y
visortogonālākais/y
visplebejiskākais/y
vissalcietīgākais/y
vissviedrainākais/y
visvirtuozākais/y
vālodze/smSf
vāģis/wPuj
vējgrābsle/Smsf
vēsts/nT
zemene/mfsS
zemeņoga/Rrxl
zoss/nT
zāģzobains/oaYi
Žanete/Smsf
āķis/juwP
čaulīte/Sm
četrrinde/Smfs
ģenealoģisks/oaYi
ģikts/nT
ķeizariste/Sm
ķēruši/+q
ķīpa/Rlrx
šaurs/oaYi
šķitušus/k
šķērssiena/Rxrl
šķīvis/Pjwu
